Washington statutes.
RCW 35.27.200

Abandonment of consolidation.

Every town which has combined the office of treasurer with that of clerk or the office of clerk with that of treasurer may terminate the combination by ordinance, fixing the time when the combination shall cease and providing that the duties thereafter be performed by separate officials. If the office of treasurer was combined with that of clerk, the mayor shall appoint a treasurer who shall serve until the next town election when a treasurer shall be elected for the term as provided by law.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.27.200. Prior: 1945 c 58 s 4, part; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 9177-4, part.]